Illinois, session 104th, SB1307.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Environmental Protection Act is amended by 5changing Sections 39 and 40 and by adding Sections 3.178, 63.186, 3.187, 3.188, 3.189, 3.281, 34.5, 39.15, and 40.4 as 7follows: 8    (415 ILCS 5/3.178 new)9    Sec. 3.178. Cumulative impact. "Cumulative impact" means 10the total burden from chemical and nonchemical stressors and 11their interactions that affect the health, well-being, and 12quality of life of an individual, community, or population at 13a given point of time or over a period of time. 14    (415 ILCS 5/3.186 new)15    Sec. 3.186. Disproportionate harm. "Disproportionate harm" 16means the combination of cumulative impacts, including, but 17not limited to, disproportionately high and adverse human 18health impacts and disproportionately high and adverse 19environmental impacts. 20    (415 ILCS 5/3.187 new)21    Sec. 3.187. Disproportionately high and adverse   SB1307- 2 -LRB104 08111 BDA 18157 b1environmental impact. "Disproportionately high and adverse 2environmental impact" means an environmental impact that is 3disproportionately high and adverse based on the following 4factors:5        (1) Whether there is or will be an impact on the 6    natural or physical environment that significantly and 7    adversely affects an environmental justice community. Such 8    impacts may include, but are not limited to, ecological, 9    cultural, human health, economic, or social impacts on 10    minority communities, low-income communities, or Indian 11    tribes when those impacts are interrelated to impacts on 12    the natural or physical environment.13        (2) Whether environmental impacts are significant and 14    are or may be having an adverse impact on an environmental 15    justice community that appreciably exceeds, or is likely 16    to appreciably exceed, the adverse impact on the general 17    population or other appropriate comparison group.18        (3) Whether the environmental impacts occur or would 19    occur in an environmental justice community by cumulative 20    or multiple adverse exposures from environmental hazards. 21    (415 ILCS 5/3.188 new)22    Sec. 3.188. Disproportionately high and adverse human 23health impact. "Disproportionately high and adverse human 24health impact" means an impact on human health that is 25disproportionately high and adverse based on the following   SB1307- 3 -LRB104 08111 BDA 18157 b1factors:2        (1) Whether the health outcomes, which may be measured 3    in risks and rates, are significant or above generally 4    accepted norms. Adverse health impacts include, but are 5    not limited to, bodily impairment, infirmity, illness, or 6    death.7        (2) Whether the risk or rate of hazard exposure for an 8    environmental justice community to an environmental hazard 9    is significant and appreciably exceeds, or is likely to 10    appreciably exceed, the risk or rate of hazard exposure 11    for the general population or in comparison to another 12    appropriate group.13        (3) Whether health impacts occur in an environmental 14    justice community affected by cumulative or multiple 15    adverse exposures from environmental hazards. 16    (415 ILCS 5/3.189 new)17    Sec. 3.189. Environmental justice community. 18"Environmental justice community" means any geographic area in 19the State that is contained within:20        (1) an environmental justice community under the 21    Illinois Solar for All Program, as that definition is 22    updated from time to time by the Illinois Power Agency and 23    the Administrator of that Program, so long as the 24    community is designated as an environmental justice 25    community within 60 days of a community receiving   SB1307- 4 -LRB104 08111 BDA 18157 b1    notification of a permit under the federal Clean Air Act; 2    or3        (2) an R3 Area established under Section 10-40 of the 4    Cannabis Regulation and Tax Act. 5    (415 ILCS 5/3.281 new)6    Sec. 3.281. Linguistically isolated community. 7"Linguistically isolated community" means the population 8within a United States Census Bureau tract composed of 9individuals at least 20% of whom are age 14 years or older and 10who speak English less than very well, based on data in the 11United States Census Bureau's latest one-year or 5-year 12American Community Survey. 13    (415 ILCS 5/34.5 new)14    Sec. 34.5. Environmentally beneficial project bank. 15    (a) The Agency shall establish and maintain on its website 16a bank of potential environmentally beneficial projects. The 17website must permit members of the public to submit 18suggestions for environmentally beneficial projects. The 19Agency shall assess the submissions for feasibility and 20clarity before inclusion in the bank.21    (b) A supplemental environmental project is not required 22to be included within the environmentally beneficial project 23bank required under subsection (a) in order to offset a civil 24penalty.    SB1307- 5 -LRB104 08111 BDA 18157 b1    (415 ILCS 5/39)  (from Ch. 111 1/2, par. 1039)2    Sec. 39. Issuance of permits; procedures. 3    (a) When the Board has by regulation required a permit for 4the construction, installation, or operation of any type of 5facility, equipment, vehicle, vessel, or aircraft, the 6applicant shall apply to the Agency for such permit and it 7shall be the duty of the Agency to issue such a permit upon 8proof by the applicant that the facility, equipment, vehicle, 9vessel, or aircraft will not cause a violation of this Act or 10of regulations hereunder and that denial of the permit is not 11otherwise justified under this Section. The Agency shall adopt 12such procedures as are necessary to carry out its duties under 13this Section. In making its determinations on permit 14applications under this Section the Agency shall may consider 15prior adjudications of noncompliance with this Act by the 16applicant that involved a release of a contaminant into the 17environment. In granting permits, the Agency shall may impose 18reasonable conditions specifically related to the applicant's 19past compliance history with this Act as necessary to correct, 20detect, or prevent noncompliance. The Agency shall may impose 21such other conditions as may be necessary to accomplish the 22purposes of this Act, and as are not inconsistent with the 23regulations promulgated by the Board hereunder. Except as 24otherwise provided in this Act, a bond or other security shall 25not be required as a condition for the issuance of a permit. If   SB1307- 6 -LRB104 08111 BDA 18157 b1the Agency denies any permit under this Section, the Agency 2shall transmit to the applicant within the time limitations of 3this Section specific, detailed statements as to the reasons 4the permit application was denied. Such statements shall 5include, but not be limited to, the following:6        (i) the Sections of this Act which may be violated if 7    the permit were granted;8        (ii) the provision of the regulations, promulgated 9    under this Act, which may be violated if the permit were 10    granted;11        (iii) the specific type of information, if any, which 12    the Agency deems the applicant did not provide the Agency; 13    and14        (iv) a statement of specific reasons why the Act and 15    the regulations might not be met if the permit were 16    granted.17    If there is no final action by the Agency within 90 days 18after the filing of the application for permit, the applicant 19may deem the permit issued; except that this time period shall 20be extended to 180 days when (1) notice and opportunity for 21public hearing are required by State or federal law or 22regulation, (2) the application which was filed is for any 23permit to develop a landfill subject to issuance pursuant to 24this subsection, or (3) the application that was filed is for a 25MSWLF unit required to issue public notice under subsection 26(p) of Section 39. The 90-day and 180-day time periods for the   SB1307- 7 -LRB104 08111 BDA 18157 b1Agency to take final action do not apply to NPDES permit 2applications under subsection (b) of this Section, to RCRA 3permit applications under subsection (d) of this Section, to 4UIC permit applications under subsection (e) of this Section, 5or to CCR surface impoundment applications under subsection 6(y) of this Section.7    The Agency shall publish notice of all final permit 8determinations for development permits for MSWLF units and for 9significant permit modifications for lateral expansions for 10existing MSWLF units one time in a newspaper of general 11circulation in the county in which the unit is or is proposed 12to be located.13    After January 1, 1994 and until July 1, 1998, operating 14permits issued under this Section by the Agency for sources of 15air pollution permitted to emit less than 25 tons per year of 16any combination of regulated air pollutants, as defined in 17Section 39.5 of this Act, shall be required to be renewed only 18upon written request by the Agency consistent with applicable 19provisions of this Act and regulations promulgated hereunder. 20Such operating permits shall expire 180 days after the date of 21such a request. The Board shall revise its regulations for the 22existing State air pollution operating permit program 23consistent with this provision by January 1, 1994.24    After June 30, 1998, operating permits issued under this 25Section by the Agency for sources of air pollution that are not 26subject to Section 39.5 of this Act and are not required to   SB1307- 8 -LRB104 08111 BDA 18157 b1have a federally enforceable State operating permit shall be 2required to be renewed only upon written request by the Agency 3consistent with applicable provisions of this Act and its 4rules. Such operating permits shall expire 180 days after the 5date of such a request. Before July 1, 1998, the Board shall 6revise its rules for the existing State air pollution 7operating permit program consistent with this paragraph and 8shall adopt rules that require a source to demonstrate that it 9qualifies for a permit under this paragraph.10    (b) The Agency may issue NPDES permits exclusively under 11this subsection for the discharge of contaminants from point 12sources into navigable waters, all as defined in the Federal 13Water Pollution Control Act, as now or hereafter amended, 14within the jurisdiction of the State, or into any well.15    All NPDES permits shall contain those terms and 16conditions, including, but not limited to, schedules of 17compliance, which may be required to accomplish the purposes 18and provisions of this Act.19    The Agency may issue general NPDES permits for discharges 20from categories of point sources which are subject to the same 21permit limitations and conditions. Such general permits may be 22issued without individual applications and shall conform to 23regulations promulgated under Section 402 of the Federal Water 24Pollution Control Act, as now or hereafter amended.25    The Agency may include, among such conditions, effluent 26limitations and other requirements established under this Act,   SB1307- 9 -LRB104 08111 BDA 18157 b1Board regulations, the Federal Water Pollution Control Act, as 2now or hereafter amended, and regulations pursuant thereto, 3and schedules for achieving compliance therewith at the 4earliest reasonable date.5    The Agency shall adopt filing requirements and procedures 6which are necessary and appropriate for the issuance of NPDES 7permits, and which are consistent with the Act or regulations 8adopted by the Board, and with the Federal Water Pollution 9Control Act, as now or hereafter amended, and regulations 10pursuant thereto.11    The Agency, subject to any conditions which may be 12prescribed by Board regulations, may issue NPDES permits to 13allow discharges beyond deadlines established by this Act or 14by regulations of the Board without the requirement of a 15variance, subject to the Federal Water Pollution Control Act, 16as now or hereafter amended, and regulations pursuant thereto.17    (c) Except for those facilities owned or operated by 18sanitary districts organized under the Metropolitan Water 19Reclamation District Act, no permit for the development or 20construction of a new pollution control facility may be 21granted by the Agency unless the applicant submits proof to 22the Agency that the location of the facility has been approved 23by the county board of the county if in an unincorporated area, 24or the governing body of the municipality when in an 25incorporated area, in which the facility is to be located in 26accordance with Section 39.2 of this Act. For purposes of this   SB1307- 10 -LRB104 08111 BDA 18157 b1subsection (c), and for purposes of Section 39.2 of this Act, 2the appropriate county board or governing body of the 3municipality shall be the county board of the county or the 4governing body of the municipality in which the facility is to 5be located as of the date when the application for siting 6approval is filed. 7    In the event that siting approval granted pursuant to 8Section 39.2 has been transferred to a subsequent owner or 9operator, that subsequent owner or operator may apply to the 10Agency for, and the Agency may grant, a development or 11construction permit for the facility for which local siting 12approval was granted. Upon application to the Agency for a 13development or construction permit by that subsequent owner or 14operator, the permit applicant shall cause written notice of 15the permit application to be served upon the appropriate 16county board or governing body of the municipality that 17granted siting approval for that facility and upon any party 18to the siting proceeding pursuant to which siting approval was 19granted. In that event, the Agency shall conduct an evaluation 20of the subsequent owner or operator's prior experience in 21waste management operations in the manner conducted under 22subsection (i) of Section 39 of this Act.23    Beginning August 20, 1993, if the pollution control 24facility consists of a hazardous or solid waste disposal 25facility for which the proposed site is located in an 26unincorporated area of a county with a population of less than   SB1307- 11 -LRB104 08111 BDA 18157 b1100,000 and includes all or a portion of a parcel of land that 2was, on April 1, 1993, adjacent to a municipality having a 3population of less than 5,000, then the local siting review 4required under this subsection (c) in conjunction with any 5permit applied for after that date shall be performed by the 6governing body of that adjacent municipality rather than the 7county board of the county in which the proposed site is 8located; and for the purposes of that local siting review, any 9references in this Act to the county board shall be deemed to 10mean the governing body of that adjacent municipality; 11provided, however, that the provisions of this paragraph shall 12not apply to any proposed site which was, on April 1, 1993, 13owned in whole or in part by another municipality.14    In the case of a pollution control facility for which a 15development permit was issued before November 12, 1981, if an 16operating permit has not been issued by the Agency prior to 17August 31, 1989 for any portion of the facility, then the 18Agency may not issue or renew any development permit nor issue 19an original operating permit for any portion of such facility 20unless the applicant has submitted proof to the Agency that 21the location of the facility has been approved by the 22appropriate county board or municipal governing body pursuant 23to Section 39.2 of this Act.24    After January 1, 1994, if a solid waste disposal facility, 25any portion for which an operating permit has been issued by 26the Agency, has not accepted waste disposal for 5 or more   SB1307- 12 -LRB104 08111 BDA 18157 b1consecutive calendar years, before that facility may accept 2any new or additional waste for disposal, the owner and 3operator must obtain a new operating permit under this Act for 4that facility unless the owner and operator have applied to 5the Agency for a permit authorizing the temporary suspension 6of waste acceptance. The Agency may not issue a new operation 7permit under this Act for the facility unless the applicant 8has submitted proof to the Agency that the location of the 9facility has been approved or re-approved by the appropriate 10county board or municipal governing body under Section 39.2 of 11this Act after the facility ceased accepting waste.12    Except for those facilities owned or operated by sanitary 13districts organized under the Metropolitan Water Reclamation 14District Act, and except for new pollution control facilities 15governed by Section 39.2, and except for fossil fuel mining 16facilities, the granting of a permit under this Act shall not 17relieve the applicant from meeting and securing all necessary 18zoning approvals from the unit of government having zoning 19jurisdiction over the proposed facility.20    Before beginning construction on any new sewage treatment 21plant or sludge drying site to be owned or operated by a 22sanitary district organized under the Metropolitan Water 23Reclamation District Act for which a new permit (rather than 24the renewal or amendment of an existing permit) is required, 25such sanitary district shall hold a public hearing within the 26municipality within which the proposed facility is to be   SB1307- 13 -LRB104 08111 BDA 18157 b1located, or within the nearest community if the proposed 2facility is to be located within an unincorporated area, at 3which information concerning the proposed facility shall be 4made available to the public, and members of the public shall 5be given the opportunity to express their views concerning the 6proposed facility.7    The Agency may issue a permit for a municipal waste 8transfer station without requiring approval pursuant to 9Section 39.2 provided that the following demonstration is 10made:11        (1) the municipal waste transfer station was in 12    existence on or before January 1, 1979 and was in 13    continuous operation from January 1, 1979 to January 1, 14    1993;15        (2) the operator submitted a permit application to the 16    Agency to develop and operate the municipal waste transfer 17    station during April of 1994;18        (3) the operator can demonstrate that the county board 19    of the county, if the municipal waste transfer station is 20    in an unincorporated area, or the governing body of the 21    municipality, if the station is in an incorporated area, 22    does not object to resumption of the operation of the 23    station; and24        (4) the site has local zoning approval.25    (d) The Agency may issue RCRA permits exclusively under 26this subsection to persons owning or operating a facility for   SB1307- 14 -LRB104 08111 BDA 18157 b1the treatment, storage, or disposal of hazardous waste as 2defined under this Act. Subsection (y) of this Section, rather 3than this subsection (d), shall apply to permits issued for 4CCR surface impoundments. 5    All RCRA permits shall contain those terms and conditions, 6including, but not limited to, schedules of compliance, which 7may be required to accomplish the purposes and provisions of 8this Act. The Agency may include among such conditions 9standards and other requirements established under this Act, 10Board regulations, the Resource Conservation and Recovery Act 11of 1976 (P.L. 94-580), as amended, and regulations pursuant 12thereto, and may include schedules for achieving compliance 13therewith as soon as possible. The Agency shall require that a 14performance bond or other security be provided as a condition 15for the issuance of a RCRA permit.16    In the case of a permit to operate a hazardous waste or PCB 17incinerator as defined in subsection (k) of Section 44, the 18Agency shall require, as a condition of the permit, that the 19operator of the facility perform such analyses of the waste to 20be incinerated as may be necessary and appropriate to ensure 21the safe operation of the incinerator.22    The Agency shall adopt filing requirements and procedures 23which are necessary and appropriate for the issuance of RCRA 24permits, and which are consistent with the Act or regulations 25adopted by the Board, and with the Resource Conservation and 26Recovery Act of 1976 (P.L. 94-580), as amended, and   SB1307- 15 -LRB104 08111 BDA 18157 b1regulations pursuant thereto.2    The applicant shall make available to the public for 3inspection all documents submitted by the applicant to the 4Agency in furtherance of an application, with the exception of 5trade secrets, at the office of the county board or governing 6body of the municipality. Such documents may be copied upon 7payment of the actual cost of reproduction during regular 8business hours of the local office. The Agency shall issue a 9written statement concurrent with its grant or denial of the 10permit explaining the basis for its decision.11    (e) The Agency may issue UIC permits exclusively under 12this subsection to persons owning or operating a facility for 13the underground injection of contaminants as defined under 14this Act.15    All UIC permits shall contain those terms and conditions, 16including, but not limited to, schedules of compliance, which 17may be required to accomplish the purposes and provisions of 18this Act. The Agency may include among such conditions 19standards and other requirements established under this Act, 20Board regulations, the Safe Drinking Water Act (P.L. 93-523), 21as amended, and regulations pursuant thereto, and may include 22schedules for achieving compliance therewith. The Agency shall 23require that a performance bond or other security be provided 24as a condition for the issuance of a UIC permit.25    The Agency shall adopt filing requirements and procedures 26which are necessary and appropriate for the issuance of UIC   SB1307- 16 -LRB104 08111 BDA 18157 b1permits, and which are consistent with the Act or regulations 2adopted by the Board, and with the Safe Drinking Water Act 3(P.L. 93-523), as amended, and regulations pursuant thereto.4    The applicant shall make available to the public for 5inspection all documents submitted by the applicant to the 6Agency in furtherance of an application, with the exception of 7trade secrets, at the office of the county board or governing 8body of the municipality. Such documents may be copied upon 9payment of the actual cost of reproduction during regular 10business hours of the local office. The Agency shall issue a 11written statement concurrent with its grant or denial of the 12permit explaining the basis for its decision.13    (f) In making any determination pursuant to Section 9.1 of 14this Act:15        (1) The Agency shall have authority to make the 16    determination of any question required to be determined by 17    the Clean Air Act, as now or hereafter amended, this Act, 18    or the regulations of the Board, including the 19    determination of the Lowest Achievable Emission Rate, 20    Maximum Achievable Control Technology, or Best Available 21    Control Technology, consistent with the Board's 22    regulations, if any.23        (2) The Agency shall adopt requirements as necessary 24    to implement public participation procedures, including, 25    but not limited to, public notice, comment, and an 26    opportunity for hearing, which must accompany the   SB1307- 17 -LRB104 08111 BDA 18157 b1    processing of applications for PSD permits. The Agency 2    shall briefly describe and respond to all significant 3    comments on the draft permit raised during the public 4    comment period or during any hearing. The Agency may group 5    related comments together and provide one unified response 6    for each issue raised.7        (3) Any complete permit application submitted to the 8    Agency under this subsection for a PSD permit shall be 9    granted or denied by the Agency not later than one year 10    after the filing of such completed application. 11        (4) The Agency shall, after conferring with the 12    applicant, give written notice to the applicant of its 13    proposed decision on the application, including the terms 14    and conditions of the permit to be issued and the facts, 15    conduct, or other basis upon which the Agency will rely to 16    support its proposed action.17    (g) The Agency shall include as conditions upon all 18permits issued for hazardous waste disposal sites such 19restrictions upon the future use of such sites as are 20reasonably necessary to protect public health and the 21environment, including permanent prohibition of the use of 22such sites for purposes which may create an unreasonable risk 23of injury to human health or to the environment. After 24administrative and judicial challenges to such restrictions 25have been exhausted, the Agency shall file such restrictions 26of record in the Office of the Recorder of the county in which   SB1307- 18 -LRB104 08111 BDA 18157 b1the hazardous waste disposal site is located.2    (h) A hazardous waste stream may not be deposited in a 3permitted hazardous waste site unless specific authorization 4is obtained from the Agency by the generator and disposal site 5owner and operator for the deposit of that specific hazardous 6waste stream. The Agency may grant specific authorization for 7disposal of hazardous waste streams only after the generator 8has reasonably demonstrated that, considering technological 9feasibility and economic reasonableness, the hazardous waste 10cannot be reasonably recycled for reuse, nor incinerated or 11chemically, physically, or biologically treated so as to 12neutralize the hazardous waste and render it nonhazardous. In 13granting authorization under this Section, the Agency may 14impose such conditions as may be necessary to accomplish the 15purposes of the Act and are consistent with this Act and 16regulations promulgated by the Board hereunder. If the Agency 17refuses to grant authorization under this Section, the 18applicant may appeal as if the Agency refused to grant a 19permit, pursuant to the provisions of subsection (a) of 20Section 40 of this Act. For purposes of this subsection (h), 21the term "generator" has the meaning given in Section 3.205 of 22this Act, unless: (1) the hazardous waste is treated, 23incinerated, or partially recycled for reuse prior to 24disposal, in which case the last person who treats, 25incinerates, or partially recycles the hazardous waste prior 26to disposal is the generator; or (2) the hazardous waste is   SB1307- 19 -LRB104 08111 BDA 18157 b1from a response action, in which case the person performing 2the response action is the generator. This subsection (h) does 3not apply to any hazardous waste that is restricted from land 4disposal under 35 Ill. Adm. Code 728.5    (i) Before issuing any RCRA permit, any permit for a waste 6storage site, sanitary landfill, waste disposal site, waste 7transfer station, waste treatment facility, waste incinerator, 8or any waste-transportation operation, any permit or interim 9authorization for a clean construction or demolition debris 10fill operation, or any permit required under subsection (d-5) 11of Section 55, the Agency shall conduct an evaluation of the 12prospective owner's or operator's prior experience in waste 13management operations, clean construction or demolition debris 14fill operations, and tire storage site management. The Agency 15may deny such a permit, or deny or revoke interim 16authorization, if the prospective owner or operator or any 17employee or officer of the prospective owner or operator has a 18history of:19        (1) repeated violations of federal, State, or local 20    laws, regulations, standards, or ordinances in the 21    operation of waste management facilities or sites, clean 22    construction or demolition debris fill operation 23    facilities or sites, or tire storage sites; or24        (2) conviction in this or another State of any crime 25    which is a felony under the laws of this State, or 26    conviction of a felony in a federal court; or conviction   SB1307- 20 -LRB104 08111 BDA 18157 b1    in this or another state or federal court of any of the 2    following crimes: forgery, official misconduct, bribery, 3    perjury, or knowingly submitting false information under 4    any environmental law, regulation, or permit term or 5    condition; or6        (3) proof of gross carelessness or incompetence in 7    handling, storing, processing, transporting, or disposing 8    of waste, clean construction or demolition debris, or used 9    or waste tires, or proof of gross carelessness or 10    incompetence in using clean construction or demolition 11    debris as fill.12    (i-5) Before issuing any permit or approving any interim 13authorization for a clean construction or demolition debris 14fill operation in which any ownership interest is transferred 15between January 1, 2005, and the effective date of the 16prohibition set forth in Section 22.52 of this Act, the Agency 17shall conduct an evaluation of the operation if any previous 18activities at the site or facility may have caused or allowed 19contamination of the site. It shall be the responsibility of 20the owner or operator seeking the permit or interim 21authorization to provide to the Agency all of the information 22necessary for the Agency to conduct its evaluation. The Agency 23may deny a permit or interim authorization if previous 24activities at the site may have caused or allowed 25contamination at the site, unless such contamination is 26authorized under any permit issued by the Agency.   SB1307- 21 -LRB104 08111 BDA 18157 b1    (j) The issuance under this Act of a permit to engage in 2the surface mining of any resources other than fossil fuels 3shall not relieve the permittee from its duty to comply with 4any applicable local law regulating the commencement, 5location, or operation of surface mining facilities.6    (k) A development permit issued under subsection (a) of 7Section 39 for any facility or site which is required to have a 8permit under subsection (d) of Section 21 shall expire at the 9end of 2 calendar years from the date upon which it was issued, 10unless within that period the applicant has taken action to 11develop the facility or the site. In the event that review of 12the conditions of the development permit is sought pursuant to 13Section 40 or 41, or permittee is prevented from commencing 14development of the facility or site by any other litigation 15beyond the permittee's control, such two-year period shall be 16deemed to begin on the date upon which such review process or 17litigation is concluded.18    (l) No permit shall be issued by the Agency under this Act 19for construction or operation of any facility or site located 20within the boundaries of any setback zone established pursuant 21to this Act, where such construction or operation is 22prohibited.23    (m) The Agency may issue permits to persons owning or 24operating a facility for composting landscape waste. In 25granting such permits, the Agency may impose such conditions 26as may be necessary to accomplish the purposes of this Act, and   SB1307- 22 -LRB104 08111 BDA 18157 b1as are not inconsistent with applicable regulations 2promulgated by the Board. Except as otherwise provided in this 3Act, a bond or other security shall not be required as a 4condition for the issuance of a permit. If the Agency denies 5any permit pursuant to this subsection, the Agency shall 6transmit to the applicant within the time limitations of this 7subsection specific, detailed statements as to the reasons the 8permit application was denied. Such statements shall include 9but not be limited to the following:10        (1) the Sections of this Act that may be violated if 11    the permit were granted;12        (2) the specific regulations promulgated pursuant to 13    this Act that may be violated if the permit were granted;14        (3) the specific information, if any, the Agency deems 15    the applicant did not provide in its application to the 16    Agency; and17        (4) a statement of specific reasons why the Act and 18    the regulations might be violated if the permit were 19    granted.20    If no final action is taken by the Agency within 90 days 21after the filing of the application for permit, the applicant 22may deem the permit issued. Any applicant for a permit may 23waive the 90-day limitation by filing a written statement with 24the Agency.25    The Agency shall issue permits for such facilities upon 26receipt of an application that includes a legal description of   SB1307- 23 -LRB104 08111 BDA 18157 b1the site, a topographic map of the site drawn to the scale of 2200 feet to the inch or larger, a description of the operation, 3including the area served, an estimate of the volume of 4materials to be processed, and documentation that:5        (1) the facility includes a setback of at least 200 6    feet from the nearest potable water supply well;7        (2) the facility is located outside the boundary of 8    the 10-year floodplain or the site will be floodproofed;9        (3) the facility is located so as to minimize 10    incompatibility with the character of the surrounding 11    area, including at least a 200 foot setback from any 12    residence, and in the case of a facility that is developed 13    or the permitted composting area of which is expanded 14    after November 17, 1991, the composting area is located at 15    least 1/8 mile from the nearest residence (other than a 16    residence located on the same property as the facility);17        (4) the design of the facility will prevent any 18    compost material from being placed within 5 feet of the 19    water table, will adequately control runoff from the site, 20    and will collect and manage any leachate that is generated 21    on the site;22        (5) the operation of the facility will include 23    appropriate dust and odor control measures, limitations on 24    operating hours, appropriate noise control measures for 25    shredding, chipping and similar equipment, management 26    procedures for composting, containment and disposal of   SB1307- 24 -LRB104 08111 BDA 18157 b1    non-compostable wastes, procedures to be used for 2    terminating operations at the site, and recordkeeping 3    sufficient to document the amount of materials received, 4    composted, and otherwise disposed of; and5        (6) the operation will be conducted in accordance with 6    any applicable rules adopted by the Board.7    The Agency shall issue renewable permits of not longer 8than 10 years in duration for the composting of landscape 9wastes, as defined in Section 3.155 of this Act, based on the 10above requirements.11    The operator of any facility permitted under this 12subsection (m) must submit a written annual statement to the 13Agency on or before April 1 of each year that includes an 14estimate of the amount of material, in tons, received for 15composting.16    (n) The Agency shall issue permits jointly with the 17Department of Transportation for the dredging or deposit of 18material in Lake Michigan in accordance with Section 18 of the 19Rivers, Lakes, and Streams Act.20    (o) (Blank).21    (p) (1) Any person submitting an application for a permit 22for a new MSWLF unit or for a lateral expansion under 23subsection (t) of Section 21 of this Act for an existing MSWLF 24unit that has not received and is not subject to local siting 25approval under Section 39.2 of this Act shall publish notice 26of the application in a newspaper of general circulation in   SB1307- 25 -LRB104 08111 BDA 18157 b1the county in which the MSWLF unit is or is proposed to be 2located. The notice must be published at least 15 days before 3submission of the permit application to the Agency. The notice 4shall state the name and address of the applicant, the 5location of the MSWLF unit or proposed MSWLF unit, the nature 6and size of the MSWLF unit or proposed MSWLF unit, the nature 7of the activity proposed, the probable life of the proposed 8activity, the date the permit application will be submitted, 9and a statement that persons may file written comments with 10the Agency concerning the permit application within 30 days 11after the filing of the permit application unless the time 12period to submit comments is extended by the Agency.13    When a permit applicant submits information to the Agency 14to supplement a permit application being reviewed by the 15Agency, the applicant shall not be required to reissue the 16notice under this subsection.17    (2) The Agency shall accept written comments concerning 18the permit application that are postmarked no later than 30 19days after the filing of the permit application, unless the 20time period to accept comments is extended by the Agency.21    (3) Each applicant for a permit described in part (1) of 22this subsection shall file a copy of the permit application 23with the county board or governing body of the municipality in 24which the MSWLF unit is or is proposed to be located at the 25same time the application is submitted to the Agency. The 26permit application filed with the county board or governing   SB1307- 26 -LRB104 08111 BDA 18157 b1body of the municipality shall include all documents submitted 2to or to be submitted to the Agency, except trade secrets as 3determined under Section 7.1 of this Act. The permit 4application and other documents on file with the county board 5or governing body of the municipality shall be made available 6for public inspection during regular business hours at the 7office of the county board or the governing body of the 8municipality and may be copied upon payment of the actual cost 9of reproduction.10    (q) Within 6 months after July 12, 2011 (the effective 11date of Public Act 97-95), the Agency, in consultation with 12the regulated community, shall develop a web portal to be 13posted on its website for the purpose of enhancing review and 14promoting timely issuance of permits required by this Act. At 15a minimum, the Agency shall make the following information 16available on the web portal:17        (1) Checklists and guidance relating to the completion 18    of permit applications, developed pursuant to subsection 19    (s) of this Section, which may include, but are not 20    limited to, existing instructions for completing the 21    applications and examples of complete applications. As the 22    Agency develops new checklists and develops guidance, it 23    shall supplement the web portal with those materials.24        (2) Within 2 years after July 12, 2011 (the effective 25    date of Public Act 97-95), permit application forms or 26    portions of permit applications that can be completed and   SB1307- 27 -LRB104 08111 BDA 18157 b1    saved electronically, and submitted to the Agency 2    electronically with digital signatures.3        (3) Within 2 years after July 12, 2011 (the effective 4    date of Public Act 97-95), an online tracking system where 5    an applicant may review the status of its pending 6    application, including the name and contact information of 7    the permit analyst assigned to the application. Until the 8    online tracking system has been developed, the Agency 9    shall post on its website semi-annual permitting 10    efficiency tracking reports that include statistics on the 11    timeframes for Agency action on the following types of 12    permits received after July 12, 2011 (the effective date 13    of Public Act 97-95): air construction permits, new NPDES 14    permits and associated water construction permits, and 15    modifications of major NPDES permits and associated water 16    construction permits. The reports must be posted by 17    February 1 and August 1 each year and shall include:18            (A) the number of applications received for each 19        type of permit, the number of applications on which 20        the Agency has taken action, and the number of 21        applications still pending; and22            (B) for those applications where the Agency has 23        not taken action in accordance with the timeframes set 24        forth in this Act, the date the application was 25        received and the reasons for any delays, which may 26        include, but shall not be limited to, (i) the   SB1307- 28 -LRB104 08111 BDA 18157 b1        application being inadequate or incomplete, (ii) 2        scientific or technical disagreements with the 3        applicant, USEPA, or other local, state, or federal 4        agencies involved in the permitting approval process, 5        (iii) public opposition to the permit, or (iv) Agency 6        staffing shortages. To the extent practicable, the 7        tracking report shall provide approximate dates when 8        cause for delay was identified by the Agency, when the 9        Agency informed the applicant of the problem leading 10        to the delay, and when the applicant remedied the 11        reason for the delay.12    (r) Upon the request of the applicant, the Agency shall 13notify the applicant of the permit analyst assigned to the 14application upon its receipt.15    (s) The Agency is authorized to prepare and distribute 16guidance documents relating to its administration of this 17Section and procedural rules implementing this Section. 18Guidance documents prepared under this subsection shall not be 19considered rules and shall not be subject to the Illinois 20Administrative Procedure Act. Such guidance shall not be 21binding on any party.22    (t) Except as otherwise prohibited by federal law or 23regulation, any person submitting an application for a permit 24may include with the application suggested permit language for 25Agency consideration. The Agency is not obligated to use the 26suggested language or any portion thereof in its permitting   SB1307- 29 -LRB104 08111 BDA 18157 b1decision. If requested by the permit applicant, the Agency 2shall meet with the applicant to discuss the suggested 3language.4    (u) If requested by the permit applicant, the Agency shall 5provide the permit applicant with a copy of the draft permit 6prior to any public review period.7    (v) If requested by the permit applicant, the Agency shall 8provide the permit applicant with a copy of the final permit 9prior to its issuance. 10    (w) An air pollution permit shall not be required due to 11emissions of greenhouse gases, as specified by Section 9.15 of 12this Act.13    (x) If, before the expiration of a State operating permit 14that is issued pursuant to subsection (a) of this Section and 15contains federally enforceable conditions limiting the 16potential to emit of the source to a level below the major 17source threshold for that source so as to exclude the source 18from the Clean Air Act Permit Program, the Agency receives a 19complete application for the renewal of that permit, then all 20of the terms and conditions of the permit shall remain in 21effect until final administrative action has been taken on the 22application for the renewal of the permit. 23    (y) The Agency may issue permits exclusively under this 24subsection to persons owning or operating a CCR surface 25impoundment subject to Section 22.59.26    All CCR surface impoundment permits shall contain those   SB1307- 30 -LRB104 08111 BDA 18157 b1terms and conditions, including, but not limited to, schedules 2of compliance, which may be required to accomplish the 3purposes and provisions of this Act, Board regulations, the 4Illinois Groundwater Protection Act and regulations pursuant 5thereto, and the Resource Conservation and Recovery Act and 6regulations pursuant thereto, and may include schedules for 7achieving compliance therewith as soon as possible.8    The Board shall adopt filing requirements and procedures 9that are necessary and appropriate for the issuance of CCR 10surface impoundment permits and that are consistent with this 11Act or regulations adopted by the Board, and with the RCRA, as 12amended, and regulations pursuant thereto.13    The applicant shall make available to the public for 14inspection all documents submitted by the applicant to the 15Agency in furtherance of an application, with the exception of 16trade secrets, on its public internet website as well as at the 17office of the county board or governing body of the 18municipality where CCR from the CCR surface impoundment will 19be permanently disposed. Such documents may be copied upon 20payment of the actual cost of reproduction during regular 21business hours of the local office.22    The Agency shall issue a written statement concurrent with 23its grant or denial of the permit explaining the basis for its 24decision. 25    (z) If a mass animal mortality event is declared by the 26Department of Agriculture in accordance with the Animal   SB1307- 31 -LRB104 08111 BDA 18157 b1Mortality Act:2        (1) the owner or operator responsible for the disposal 3    of dead animals is exempted from the following:4            (i) obtaining a permit for the construction, 5        installation, or operation of any type of facility or 6        equipment issued in accordance with subsection (a) of 7        this Section;8            (ii) obtaining a permit for open burning in 9        accordance with the rules adopted by the Board; and10            (iii) registering the disposal of dead animals as 11        an eligible small source with the Agency in accordance 12        with Section 9.14 of this Act; 13        (2) as applicable, the owner or operator responsible 14    for the disposal of dead animals is required to obtain the 15    following permits:16            (i) an NPDES permit in accordance with subsection 17        (b) of this Section;18            (ii) a PSD permit or an NA NSR permit in accordance 19        with Section 9.1 of this Act;20            (iii) a lifetime State operating permit or a 21        federally enforceable State operating permit, in 22        accordance with subsection (a) of this Section; or23            (iv) a CAAPP permit, in accordance with Section 24        39.5 of this Act. 25    All CCR surface impoundment permits shall contain those 26terms and conditions, including, but not limited to, schedules   SB1307- 32 -LRB104 08111 BDA 18157 b1of compliance, which may be required to accomplish the 2purposes and provisions of this Act, Board regulations, the 3Illinois Groundwater Protection Act and regulations pursuant 4thereto, and the Resource Conservation and Recovery Act and 5regulations pursuant thereto, and may include schedules for 6achieving compliance therewith as soon as possible.7    The Board shall adopt filing requirements and procedures 8that are necessary and appropriate for the issuance of CCR 9surface impoundment permits and that are consistent with this 10Act or regulations adopted by the Board, and with the RCRA, as 11amended, and regulations pursuant thereto.12    The applicant shall make available to the public for 13inspection all documents submitted by the applicant to the 14Agency in furtherance of an application, with the exception of 15trade secrets, on its public internet website as well as at the 16office of the county board or governing body of the 17municipality where CCR from the CCR surface impoundment will 18be permanently disposed. Such documents may be copied upon 19payment of the actual cost of reproduction during regular 20business hours of the local office.21    The Agency shall issue a written statement concurrent with 22its grant or denial of the permit explaining the basis for its 23decision.24    (aa) The Agency shall not issue any of the following 25construction permits unless the applicant for the permit 26submits to the Agency with its permit application proof that   SB1307- 33 -LRB104 08111 BDA 18157 b1the permit applicant has conducted a public meeting pursuant 2to this subsection (aa) and submitted an environmental justice 3assessment pursuant to subsection (bb): (i) a construction 4permit for a new source that is to be located in an 5environmental justice community, that will require a CAAPP 6permit or a federally enforceable State operating permit, and 7that would be authorized under that permit to increase annual 8permitted emissions; (ii) a construction permit for any 9existing source that is located in an environmental justice 10community, that, on the effective date of this amendatory Act 11of the 104th General Assembly, possesses a CAAPP permit or 12federally enforceable State operating permit, and that would 13be authorized under that permit to increase annual permitted 14emissions; or (iii) a construction permit for any existing 15source that is located in an environmental justice community, 16that would require a new CAAPP permit or new federally 17enforceable State operating permit for the first time, and 18that would be authorized under that permit to increase annual 19permitted emissions. This subsection (aa) also applies to 20permit applications for modifications or expansions to 21existing sources that will result in an increase in the hourly 22rate of emissions or the total annual emissions of any air 23pollutant. The public meeting required under this subsection 24(aa) shall be held within the environmental justice community 25where the proposed source is located or to be located, and the 26applicant shall collect public comments at the meeting.  SB1307- 34 -LRB104 08111 BDA 18157 b1        (1) Notice of the public meeting shall be provided 30 2    days in advance to:3            (A) local elected officials in the area where the 4        proposed source is to be located, including the mayor 5        or village president, municipal clerk, county board 6        chairman, county clerk, and State's Attorney;7            (B) members of the General Assembly from the 8        legislative district in which the proposed source is 9        to be located; and10            (C) directors of child care centers licensed by 11        the Department of Children and Family Services, school 12        principals, and public park superintendents who 13        oversee facilities located within one mile of the 14        proposed source.15        (2) Notice of the public meeting shall be published in 16    a newspaper of general circulation.17        (3) Notice of the public meeting shall be posted on a 18    website of the applicant with a link provided to the 19    Agency for posting on the Agency's website.20        (4) Notice of the public meeting shall include all of 21    the following:22            (A) the name and address of the applicant and the 23        proposed source;24            (B) the activity or activities at the proposed 25        source to be permitted;26            (C) the proposed source's anticipated potential to   SB1307- 35 -LRB104 08111 BDA 18157 b1        emit and allowable emissions of regulated pollutants;2            (D) the date, time, and location of the public 3        meeting;4            (E) the deadline for submission of written 5        comments;6            (F) the mailing address or email address where 7        written comments can be submitted; and8            (G) the website where the summary of the 9        environmental justice assessment required under 10        subsection (bb) can be accessed.11        (5) If the population of individuals who reside within 12    one mile of the source includes individuals within a 13    linguistically isolated community, then the applicant 14    shall provide the public notice in a multilingual format 15    appropriate to the needs of the linguistically isolated 16    community and shall provide oral and written translation 17    services at the public meeting.18    At the public meeting, the applicant shall present a 19summary of the environmental justice assessment required under 20subsection (bb).21    The applicant must accept written public comments from the 22date public notice of the meeting is provided until at least 30 23days after the date of the public meeting.24    The applicant must provide with its permit application a 25copy of the meeting notice and a certification, under penalty 26of law, signed by a responsible official for the permit   SB1307- 36 -LRB104 08111 BDA 18157 b1applicant attesting (i) to the fact that a public meeting was 2held, (ii) to the information that was provided by the 3applicant at the public meeting, and (iii) that the applicant 4collected written comments and transcribed oral public 5comments in accordance with the requirements of this 6subsection (aa).7    The failure of the applicant to comply with the express 8procedural requirements under this subsection (aa) shall 9result in denial of a permit application submitted to the 10Agency.11    The Agency may propose and the Board may adopt rules 12regarding the implementation of this subsection (aa).13    (bb) The Agency shall not issue any of the construction 14permits described in subsection (aa) unless the applicant for 15the permit submits to the Agency with its permit application 16proof that the permit applicant has conducted an environmental 17justice assessment for the proposed project. The environmental 18justice assessment shall consist of the following:19        (1) Air dispersion modeling examining the air 20    quality-related impacts from the proposed project in 21    combination with existing mobile and stationary air 22    pollutant emitting sources.23    The air dispersion modeling must address emissions 24associated with issuance of the permit.25    If the air dispersion modeling reveals estimated off-site 26impacts from the proposed project, the applicant shall also   SB1307- 37 -LRB104 08111 BDA 18157 b1identify efforts that will be undertaken by the applicant 2during the construction or operation of the new source to 3mitigate such impacts.4    (2) A modeling protocol submitted to the Agency for review 5and consideration prior to performance of the air dispersion 6modeling. The modeling protocol shall include analyses 7sufficient to evaluate short-term impacts to air quality and 8impacts to air quality from nonstandard operating conditions, 9such as worst-case emission estimates under a variety of 10weather and atmospheric conditions and emissions associated 11with startup, shutdown, maintenance, and outages. Any Agency 12recommendations for revisions to the modeling protocol shall 13be provided in writing to the applicant within 120 days after 14receipt of the modeling protocol. The modeling shall be 15performed using accepted USEPA methodologies.16    (3) An environmental impact review evaluating the direct, 17indirect, and cumulative environmental impacts within the 18environmental justice community that are associated with the 19proposed project. The environmental impact review shall 20include, but shall not be limited to, the following:21        (A) a qualitative and quantitative assessment of 22    emissions-related impacts of the project on the area, 23    including an estimate of the maximum allowable emissions 24    of criteria pollutants and hazardous air pollutants from 25    the source; and26        (B) an assessment of the health-based indicators for   SB1307- 38 -LRB104 08111 BDA 18157 b1    inhalation exposure, including, but not limited to, 2    impacts to the respiratory, hematological, neurological, 3    cardiovascular, renal, and hepatic systems and cancer 4    rates.5    The environmental justice assessment must be completed by 6an independent third party.7    If the environmental justice assessment shows that the 8proposed project will cause harm to the environment or public 9health, the Agency shall impose conditions in the permit that 10will mitigate such harm, or it shall deny the permit if such 11harm is unavoidable and causes or contributes to 12disproportionate harm.13    The Agency shall propose and the Board shall adopt rules 14regarding the implementation of this subsection (bb), 15including, at a minimum, the type and nature of air dispersion 16modeling, the contents of the modeling protocol and 17environmental impact review, and a description of harm and 18disproportionate harm that may be evidenced by the 19environmental justice assessment.20    (cc) The Agency shall not issue any of the following 21construction permits unless the Agency conducts an evaluation 22of the prospective owner's or operator's prior experience in 23owning and operating sources of air pollution: (i) a 24construction permit for a new source that is to be located in 25an environmental justice community, that will require a CAAPP 26permit or a federally enforceable State operating permit, and   SB1307- 39 -LRB104 08111 BDA 18157 b1that would be authorized under that permit to increase annual 2permitted emissions; (ii) a construction permit for any 3existing source that is located in an environmental justice 4community, that, on the effective date of this amendatory Act 5of the 104th General Assembly, possesses a CAAPP permit or 6federally enforceable State operating permit, and that would 7be authorized under that permit to increase annual permitted 8emissions; or (iii) a construction permit for any existing 9source that is located in an environmental justice community, 10that would require a new CAAPP permit or new federally 11enforceable State operating permit for the first time, and 12that would be authorized under that permit to increase annual 13permitted emissions. The Agency may deny the permit if the 14prospective owner or operator or any employee or officer of 15the prospective owner or operator or any board member has a 16history of:17        (1) repeated violations of federal, State, or local 18    laws, rules, regulations, standards, or ordinances in the 19    ownership or operation of sources of air pollution;20        (2) conviction in this State, another state, or 21    federal court of knowingly submitting false information 22    under any environmental law, rule, regulation, or permit 23    term or condition; or24        (3) proof of gross carelessness or incompetence in the 25    ownership or operation of a source of air pollution. 26(Source: P.A. 101-171, eff. 7-30-19; 102-216, eff. 1-1-22;   SB1307- 40 -LRB104 08111 BDA 18157 b1102-558, eff. 8-20-21; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22.) 2    (415 ILCS 5/39.15 new)3    Sec. 39.15. Environmental justice considerations in 4permitting.5    (a) The following public participation requirements for 6permitting transactions in an environmental justice community 7must be complied with:8        (1) If an application for a permit, permit renewal, or 9    permit modification is subject to public notice and 10    comment requirements under this Act, rules adopted by the 11    Board, or rules adopted by the Agency, and the application 12    is for a facility or source in an environmental justice 13    community, the Agency must comply with existing applicable 14    requirements for public notice.15        (2) In addition to the public notice requirements 16    referenced in paragraph (1), the Agency shall provide the 17    public with notice of an application for a permit, permit 18    renewal, or permit modification if the facility or 19    proposed facility is located or is to be located in an 20    environmental justice community for individual minor or 21    major NPDES permits issued under subsection (b) of Section 22    39.23    The public notice shall be provided: (i) by prominent 24placement at a dedicated page on the Agency's website; (ii) to 25local elected officials in the area where the facility or   SB1307- 41 -LRB104 08111 BDA 18157 b1proposed facility is located or is to be located, including 2the mayor or president, clerk, county board chairman, county 3clerk, and State's Attorney; and (iii) to members of the 4General Assembly from the legislative district in which the 5facility or proposed facility is located or is to be located.6    The public notice shall include: (i) the name and address 7of the permit applicant and the facility or proposed facility; 8and (ii) the activity or activities at the facility or 9proposed facility being permitted.10    (b) If the population of individuals who reside within one 11mile of the site or facility includes individuals within a 12linguistically isolated community, then the Agency must also 13provide:14        (1) all public notices required by this Section in a 15    multilingual format appropriate to the needs of the 16    linguistically isolated community; and17        (2) oral and written translation services at public 18    hearings.19    (c) For permit applications for facilities in an 20environmental justice community, the Director of the Agency 21may grant extensions of any permitting deadlines established 22in this Act by up to an additional 180 days to allow for 23additional review of the permit application by the Agency or 24additional public participation. Any exercise of this 25authority shall be provided in writing to the permit applicant 26with the specific reason and new permitting deadline.  SB1307- 42 -LRB104 08111 BDA 18157 b1    (d) Further, for any of the following construction 2permits, the Agency shall conduct an evaluation of the 3prospective owner's or operator's prior experience in owning 4and operating sources of air pollution: (i) a construction 5permit for a new source that is to be located in an 6environmental justice community, that will require a CAAPP 7permit or a federally enforceable State operating permit, and 8that would be authorized under that permit to increase annual 9permitted emissions; (ii) a construction permit for any 10existing source that is located in an environmental justice 11community that, on the effective date of this amendatory Act 12of the 104th General Assembly, possesses a CAAPP permit or 13federally enforceable State operating permit and that would be 14authorized under that permit to increase annual permitted 15emissions; or (iii) a construction permit for any existing 16source that is located in an environmental justice community 17that would require a new CAAPP permit or new federally 18enforceable State operating permit for the first time and that 19would be authorized under that permit to increase annual 20permitted emissions. The Agency has the authority to deny such 21a permit transaction if the prospective owner or operator or 22any employee or officer of the prospective owner or operator 23or board member or manager has a history of:24        (1) repeated violations of federal, State, or local 25    laws, rules, regulations, standards, or ordinances in the 26    ownership or operation of sources of air pollution;  SB1307- 43 -LRB104 08111 BDA 18157 b1        (2) conviction in this State, another state, or 2    federal court of knowingly submitting false information 3    under any law, rule, regulation, or permit term or 4    condition regarding the environment; or5        (3) proof of gross carelessness or incompetence in the 6    ownership or operation of a source of air pollution.  7    (415 ILCS 5/40)  (from Ch. 111 1/2, par. 1040)8    Sec. 40. Appeal of permit denial. 9    (a)(1) If the Agency refuses to grant or grants with 10conditions a permit under Section 39 of this Act, the 11applicant may, within 35 days after the date on which the 12Agency served its decision on the applicant, petition for a 13hearing before the Board to contest the decision of the 14Agency. However, the 35-day period for petitioning for a 15hearing may be extended for an additional period of time not to 16exceed 90 days by written notice provided to the Board from the 17applicant and the Agency within the initial appeal period. The 18Board shall give 21 days' notice to any person in the county 19where is located the facility in issue who has requested 20notice of enforcement proceedings and to each member of the 21General Assembly in whose legislative district that 22installation or property is located; and shall publish that 2321-day notice in a newspaper of general circulation in that 24county. The Agency shall appear as respondent in such hearing. 25At such hearing the rules prescribed in Section 32 and   SB1307- 44 -LRB104 08111 BDA 18157 b1subsection (a) of Section 33 of this Act shall apply, and the 2burden of proof shall be on the petitioner. If, however, the 3Agency issues an NPDES permit that imposes limits which are 4based upon a criterion or denies a permit based upon 5application of a criterion, then the Agency shall have the 6burden of going forward with the basis for the derivation of 7those limits or criterion which were derived under the Board's 8rules.9    (2) Except as provided in paragraph (a)(3), if there is no 10final action by the Board within 120 days after the date on 11which it received the petition, the petitioner may deem the 12permit issued under this Act, provided, however, that that 13period of 120 days shall not run for any period of time, not to 14exceed 30 days, during which the Board is without sufficient 15membership to constitute the quorum required by subsection (a) 16of Section 5 of this Act, and provided further that such 120 17day period shall not be stayed for lack of quorum beyond 30 18days regardless of whether the lack of quorum exists at the 19beginning of such 120-day period or occurs during the running 20of such 120-day period.21    (3) Paragraph (a)(2) shall not apply to any permit which 22is subject to subsection (b), (d) or (e) of Section 39. If 23there is no final action by the Board within 120 days after the 24date on which it received the petition, the petitioner shall 25be entitled to an Appellate Court order pursuant to subsection 26(d) of Section 41 of this Act.  SB1307- 45 -LRB104 08111 BDA 18157 b1    (b) If the Agency grants a RCRA permit for a hazardous 2waste disposal site, a third party, other than the permit 3applicant or Agency, may, within 35 days after the date on 4which the Agency issued its decision, petition the Board for a 5hearing to contest the issuance of the permit. Unless the 6Board determines that such petition is duplicative or 7frivolous, or that the petitioner is so located as to not be 8affected by the permitted facility, the Board shall hear the 9petition in accordance with the terms of subsection (a) of 10this Section and its procedural rules governing denial 11appeals, such hearing to be based exclusively on the record 12before the Agency. The burden of proof shall be on the 13petitioner. The Agency and the permit applicant shall be named 14co-respondents.15    The provisions of this subsection do not apply to the 16granting of permits issued for the disposal or utilization of 17sludge from publicly owned sewage works.18    (c) Any party to an Agency proceeding conducted pursuant 19to Section 39.3 of this Act may petition as of right to the 20Board for review of the Agency's decision within 35 days from 21the date of issuance of the Agency's decision, provided that 22such appeal is not duplicative or frivolous. However, the 2335-day period for petitioning for a hearing may be extended by 24the applicant for a period of time not to exceed 90 days by 25written notice provided to the Board from the applicant and 26the Agency within the initial appeal period. If another person   SB1307- 46 -LRB104 08111 BDA 18157 b1with standing to appeal wishes to obtain an extension, there 2must be a written notice provided to the Board by that person, 3the Agency, and the applicant, within the initial appeal 4period. The decision of the Board shall be based exclusively 5on the record compiled in the Agency proceeding. In other 6respects the Board's review shall be conducted in accordance 7with subsection (a) of this Section and the Board's procedural 8rules governing permit denial appeals.9    (d) In reviewing the denial or any condition of a NA NSR 10permit issued by the Agency pursuant to rules and regulations 11adopted under subsection (c) of Section 9.1 of this Act, the 12decision of the Board shall be based exclusively on the record 13before the Agency including the record of the hearing, if any, 14unless the parties agree to supplement the record. The Board 15shall, if it finds the Agency is in error, make a final 16determination as to the substantive limitations of the permit 17including a final determination of Lowest Achievable Emission 18Rate. 19    (e)(1) If the Agency grants or denies a permit under 20subsection (b) of Section 39 of this Act, a third party, other 21than the permit applicant or Agency, may petition the Board 22within 35 days from the date of issuance of the Agency's 23decision, for a hearing to contest the decision of the Agency. 24    (2) A petitioner shall include the following within a 25petition submitted under subdivision (1) of this subsection:26        (A) a demonstration that the petitioner raised the   SB1307- 47 -LRB104 08111 BDA 18157 b1    issues contained within the petition during the public 2    notice period or during the public hearing on the NPDES 3    permit application, if a public hearing was held; and4        (B) a demonstration that the petitioner is so situated 5    as to be affected by the permitted facility. 6    (3) If the Board determines that the petition is not 7duplicative or frivolous and contains a satisfactory 8demonstration under subdivision (2) of this subsection, the 9Board shall hear the petition (i) in accordance with the terms 10of subsection (a) of this Section and its procedural rules 11governing permit denial appeals and (ii) exclusively on the 12basis of the record before the Agency. The burden of proof 13shall be on the petitioner. The Agency and permit applicant 14shall be named co-respondents.15    (f) Any person who files a petition to contest the 16issuance of a permit by the Agency shall pay a filing fee.17    (g) If the Agency grants or denies a permit under 18subsection (y) of Section 39, a third party, other than the 19permit applicant or Agency, may appeal the Agency's decision 20as provided under federal law for CCR surface impoundment 21permits.22    (h) If the Agency grants a permit to construct, modify, or 23operate a facility that emits air pollutants and is classified 24as a minor source, a third party, other than the permit 25applicant or Agency, may, within 35 days after the date on 26which the Agency issued its decision, petition the Board for a   SB1307- 48 -LRB104 08111 BDA 18157 b1hearing to contest the issuance of the permit. Unless the 2Board determines that the petition is duplicative or frivolous 3or that the petitioner is so located as to not be affected by 4the permitted facility, the Board shall hear the petition in 5accordance with the terms of subsection (a) of this Section 6and its procedural rules governing denial appeals. The hearing 7shall be based exclusively on the record before the Agency. 8The burden of proof shall be on the petitioner. The Agency and 9the permit applicant shall be named co-respondents. 10(Source: P.A. 101-171, eff. 7-30-19; 102-558, eff. 8-20-21.) 11    (415 ILCS 5/40.4 new)12    Sec. 40.4. Environmental justice grievance.13    (a) An environmental justice grievance process, subject to 14the provisions of this Section, applies to complaints alleging 15violations of Section 601 of the federal Civil Rights Act of 161964.17    (b) An environmental justice grievance must allege 18discrimination on the basis of an individual's actual or 19perceived race, color, religion, national origin, citizenship, 20ancestry, age, sex, marital status, order of protection 21status, conviction record, arrest record, disability, military 22status, sexual orientation, gender identity, gender 23expression, pregnancy, or unfavorable discharge from military 24service.25    (c) To initiate the environmental justice grievance   SB1307- 49 -LRB104 08111 BDA 18157 b1process a person must file a complaint with the Agency within 260 days after an alleged violation. The Agency, in its 3discretion, may waive the 60-day deadline for good cause. The 4complaint must: (1) be in writing; (2) describe with 5specificity the discrimination alleged; and (3) identify the 6parties impacted by the alleged discrimination.7    (d) The complaint under subsection (c) must be addressed 8to the Illinois Environmental Protection Agency Environmental 9Justice Officer at the address of record for the Environmental 10Justice Officer.11    (e) Within 10 days after receiving the complaint filed 12under subsection (c), the Agency shall provide written notice 13of receipt and acceptance of the complaint. If the Agency 14determines that it has jurisdiction to review the complaint, 15the complaint will be considered meritorious, unless:16        (1) the complaint clearly appears on its face to be 17    frivolous or trivial;18        (2) the complaint is not timely and good cause does 19    not exist to waive timeliness;20        (3) the Agency, within the time allotted to 21    investigate the complaint, voluntarily concedes 22    noncompliance and agrees to take appropriate remedial 23    action or agrees to an informal resolution of the 24    complaint; or25        (4) the complainant, within the time allotted for the 26    complaint to be investigated, withdraws the complaint.  SB1307- 50 -LRB104 08111 BDA 18157 b1    (f) Within 120 days after the date it provides written 2notice of receipt and acceptance of the complaint under 3subsection (e), the Agency shall make a determination of 4jurisdiction and the merits of the complaint, conduct an 5investigation, and provide a proposed resolution, if 6appropriate, to the extent practicable and allowable under 7existing laws and regulations.8    (g) The Agency may propose, and the Board may adopt, rules 9for the implementation and administration of this Section.